Arkansas, session 2025, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 11, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 10 - Recreational Tramways

15-11-1001. Findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that outdoor recreational activities:
(1) Are practiced by a large number of citizens of this state;
(2) Attract a large number of nonresidents;
(3) Significantly contribute to the economy of Arkansas;
(4) Include inherent risks in participating that should be
understood by participants; and
*CRH126*
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
(5) Have inherent risks that are essentially impossible to
eliminate by outdoor recreation operators and recreational tramway operators.
(b) The General Assembly intends with this subchapter to define:
(1) The areas of responsibility and affirmative acts for which
outdoor recreation area operators and tramway operators are liable for loss,
damage, or injury; and
(2) The risks that a participant expressly assumes and for which
there can be no recovery.

15-11-1002. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "ANSI Ski Lift Code" means the American National Standard
Institute ANSI B77.1-2022: Passenger Ropeways — Aerial Tramways, Aerial
Lifts, Surface Lifts, Tows and Conveyors — Safety Requirements, as published
by the American National Standards Institute, including any supplements or
revisions;
(2) "Outdoor recreation activity" includes the following
activities:
(A) Biking and mountain biking;
(B) Rock climbing, rappelling, and similar activities in
improved or natural areas;
(C) Canoeing, rafting, and kayaking;
(D) Hiking, backpacking, and camping; and
(E) Utilizing a recreational tramway;
(3) "Outdoor recreation area" means property owned or operated
by an outdoor recreation operator on which outdoor recreation activities are
offered or occur in exchange for a fee or using equipment rented or purchased
from the outdoor recreation operator;
(4) "Outdoor recreation operator" means the owner or operator of
an outdoor recreation area, including an agency of the state or a political
subdivision of the state, or the employees, agents, officers, or delegated
representatives of the owner or operator of the outdoor recreation area;
(5)(A) "Recreational tramway" means a device:
(i) Used to transport recreational tramway users
uphill, in cars on tracks or suspended in the air, using steel cables,
chains, or belts or by ropes; and
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
(ii) Usually supported by trestles or towers with
one (1) or more spans.
(B) "Recreational tramway" includes the following:
(i) A two-car aerial passenger tramway that is used
to transport passengers in two (2) open or enclosed cars attached to, and
suspended from, a moving wire rope or attached to a moving wire rope and
supported on a standing wire rope or a similar device;
(ii) A multi-car aerial passenger tramway that is
used to transport passengers in several open or enclosed cars attached to,
and suspended from, a moving wire rope or attached to a moving wire rope and
supported on a standing wire rope or a similar device;
(iii) A track car in which a passenger car running
on steel or wooden tracks is attached to and pulled by a steel cable or a
similar device;
(iv) A chair lift on which a passenger is carried on
a chair suspended in the air and attached to a moving cable, chain, or link
belt supported by trestles or towers with one (1) or more spans or a similar
device; and
(v) Surface-level transportation on which a
passenger is carried on a moving walkway that is commonly known as a "moving
carpet";
(6)(A) "Recreational tramway area" means:
(i) A recreational tramway in operation administered
or operated as a single enterprise;
(ii) The area beneath the recreational tramway; and
(iii) A queue, building, or structure for
approaching, embarking, or disembarking the recreational tramway.
(B) "Recreational tramway area" does not include base
lodges, motor vehicle parking lots, or other portions of areas used by
persons engaged in recreation; and
(7) "Tramway operator" means a person, including an agency of
the state or a political subdivision of the state, who owns or controls the
operation of a recreational tramway.

15-11-1003. Duties and responsibilities of persons engaged in outdoor
recreation activities.
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
(a) A person engaged in an outdoor recreation activity at an outdoor
recreation area or a recreational tramway area has a duty and responsibility
to exercise reasonable care in engaging in an outdoor recreation activity,
including without limitation the exercise of reasonable care in:
(1) Participating in an outdoor recreation activity only on
designated trails or other areas that are not marked "closed" and refraining
from participating in an outdoor recreation activity in a portion of an area
that is not a designated trail or is otherwise marked "closed";
(2) Knowing the range of his or her ability to participate in
the outdoor recreation activity in which he or she is participating and
acting within the limits of that ability;
(3) Being the sole judge of his or her knowledge of and ability
to successfully negotiate any trail, rock-climbing area, or recreational
tramway and refraining from negotiating a trail, rock-climbing area, or
recreational tramway until obtaining sufficient knowledge and ability to do
so;
(4) Heeding and obeying all warnings, notices, and signs
provided by an outdoor recreation operator or a tramway operator and not
altering, defacing, removing, or destroying the warning, notice, or sign;
(5) Maintaining control of his or her speed and course at all
times and maintaining a proper lookout to be able to avoid other participants
and objects;
(6) Staying clear of a vehicle or infrastructure other than
when:
(A) Embarking on or disembarking from a recreational
tramway; or
(B) Being present at or in a residential building or other
building that is open to the public;
(7)(A) Acting in a safe manner that will avoid contributing to
the:
(i) Injury or death of himself or herself or others;
(ii) Damage to property; or
(iii) Placing, fabricating, or shaping an object in
a trail.
(B) Acting in a safe manner as required under subdivision
(a)(7)(A) of this section includes without limitation refraining from
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
participating in an outdoor recreation activity when the participant's
ability to do so safely is impaired:
(i) By the consumption of alcohol;
(ii) By the use of any narcotic or other drug; or
(iii) While under the influence of alcohol or any
narcotic or other drug;
(8) Embarking on a recreational tramway only with the authority
of the tramway operator;
(9) Boarding or dismounting from a recreational tramway only at
a designated area;
(10) Acting in a manner while riding a recreational tramway that
is consistent with posted rules and will not interfere with the proper and
safe operation of the recreational tramway;
(11) Refraining from throwing or expelling an object while
riding on a recreational tramway and placing an object on or about the uphill
track, the entry area, or the exit area of a recreational tramway;
(12) Crossing the uphill track of a recreational tramway only at
designated locations; and
(13) When involved in an outdoor recreation activity collision
or other accident involving another individual who the participant knows or
reasonably should know needs medical or other assistance, attempting to:
(A) Obtain assistance for the individual in need of
assistance;
(B) Notify the proper authorities; and
(C) Not leave the scene of the collision or accident
without giving the participant's personal identification to an employee or
representative of the outdoor recreation operator or tramway operator, except
for the purpose of obtaining assistance for the individual; and
(D) When requested, provide his or her personal
identification to an employee or representative of the outdoor recreation
operator or tramway operator.
(b) Each passenger using a recreational tramway with the permission of
a tramway operator shall abide by and fulfill each duty and responsibility
under subsection (a) of this section that is applicable to the use of a
recreational tramway.
(c) Each participant and each passenger using a recreational tramway
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
with the permission of a tramway operator shall be deemed as a matter of law
to have seen and understood all postings, signs, and other warnings provided
by the tramway operator as required by this subchapter.
(d)(1) A tramway operator is entitled to assume, if reasonable, that
each passenger who boards a recreational tramway has sufficient knowledge,
ability, and physical dexterity to embark upon, disembark from, and negotiate
the recreational tramway.
(2) A passenger who is unfamiliar with the use of a recreational
tramway or who believes he or she does not have sufficient knowledge to
embark upon, disembark from, and negotiate a recreational tramway shall ask
the tramway operator for instruction on the use of the recreational tramway
or to provide the knowledge to embark upon, disembark from, and negotiate the
recreational tramway.
(e) This subchapter shall not be construed to extend liability to a
tramway operator for injury to or death of a participant or other individual
or damage to property resulting from a passenger who:
(1) Is unfamiliar with the use of a recreational tramway; or
(2) Believes he or she does not:
(A) Have sufficient knowledge to embark, disembark from,
or negotiate a recreational tramway;
(B) Ask the tramway operator for instruction on the use of
the recreational tramway or to provide the knowledge to embark, disembark
from, or negotiate the recreational tramway; and
(C) Have the ability or physical dexterity to embark, disembark
from, or negotiate a recreational tramway.
(f) An individual who is not authorized by the outdoor recreation
operator or tramway operator to use or be present at the outdoor recreation
area or recreational tramway area shall be deemed a trespasser.

15-11-1004. Duties of tramway operators.
(a)(1) A tramway operator is responsible for:
(A) The safe operation and maintenance of each
recreational tramway in its area whenever the recreational tramway is in use;
(B) The safe construction of a recreational tramway that
the tramway operator constructed; and
(C) Posting a sign at the bottom of a recreational tramway
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
that advises the passengers to seek advice if not familiar with riding a
recreational tramway.
(2)(A) At least once during each calendar year, a tramway
operator shall have all recreational tramways within the tramway operator's
area inspected by an individual who is qualified under Arkansas law to
inspect recreational tramways for compliance with the current requirements of
the ANSI Ski Lift Code, if applicable.
(B) Provided, however, that compliance with the ANSI Ski
Lift Code in effect within the preceding six (6) months shall be sufficient
to comply with subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.
(C) A tramway operator shall not operate a recreational
tramway that is not in compliance with the ANSI Ski Lift Code until that
recreational tramway is certified as in compliance under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section.
(D) A tramway operator's compliance with the inspection
requirement under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section does not by itself
preclude potential liability on the part of the tramway operator for a
failure to operate or maintain a recreational tramway safely.
(b)(1) If a participant or a passenger using a recreational tramway
with the permission of the tramway operator is unfamiliar with the use of a
recreational tramway and asks for instruction on its use, the tramway
operator shall provide a reasonable opportunity for the instruction.
(2) A tramway operator shall install and maintain at or near the
loading area for each recreational tramway a sign stating that if a
participant or other passenger is unfamiliar with the use of the recreational
tramway and asks for instruction for its use, the tramway operator will
provide a reasonable opportunity for the instruction.

15-11-1005. Duties of outdoor recreation operators.
An outdoor recreation operator shall have the following duties with
respect to operation of an outdoor recreation area:
(1) To maintain one (1) or more trail boards at prominent
locations at each outdoor recreation area displaying that area's network of
trails; and
(2)(A) To not intentionally, recklessly, with gross negligence,
or negligently cause injury to a person.
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
(B) Provided that, except for the duties of the outdoor
recreation operator under this subchapter, the outdoor recreation operator
shall have no duty to eliminate, alter, control, or lessen the risks inherent
in an outdoor recreation activity that include without limitation those
described in this subchapter.

15-11-1006. Assumptions of risk.
(a) A participant in an outdoor recreation activity shall be presumed
to have:
(1) Known the inherent risks of the outdoor recreation activity
in which he or she participates;
(2) Fully appreciated the nature and extent of the inherent
risks of the outdoor recreation activity; and
(3) Voluntarily exposed himself or herself to the inherent risks
of the outdoor recreation activity, even if a particular risk was not
specifically presented or stated to the participant by the outdoor recreation
operator.
(b) A passenger who uses a recreational tramway shall be presumed to
have:
(1) Known the risks of an outdoor recreation activity that are
applicable to the use of a recreational tramway;
(2) Fully appreciated the nature and extent of the risks
applicable to the use of a recreational tramway; and
(3) Voluntarily exposed himself or herself to the risks
applicable to the use of a recreational tramway, even if a particular risk
was not specifically presented or stated to the individual by the tramway
operator.
(c) A presumption under subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be
rebutted by the participant or passenger by proving that the participant or
passenger did not:
(1) Know the particular inherent risk of the outdoor recreation
activity that proximately caused the injury or death or damage to property at
issue;
(2) Fully appreciate the nature and extent of the risk; or
(3) Voluntarily expose himself or herself to the risk.
(d) An outdoor recreation operator or tramway operator's negligence is
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
not an inherent risk of an outdoor recreation activity, and a participant or
passenger is not presumed to have accepted the risk of the negligence of the
outdoor recreation operator or tramway operator and the injuries proximately
caused from the negligence.

15-11-1007. Liability of tramway operators and outdoor recreation
operators.
(a) A tramway operator or an outdoor recreation operator shall be
liable only if the tramway operator or outdoor recreation operator does any
of the following:
(1) Commits an act or omission related to an outdoor recreation
activity that is intentional, reckless, grossly negligent, or negligent
regarding the safety of an individual or property and that act or omission
proximately causes injury to or the death of the individual or damage to
property; or
(2) Intentionally, recklessly, with gross negligence, or
negligently commits an act or omission related to a participant in an outdoor
recreation activity that proximately causes injury to or the death of the
participant or other individual or damage to property.
(b)(1) A tramway operator or outdoor recreation operator shall not be
liable, and an individual or individual's representative may not recover from
a tramway operator or outdoor recreation operator for negligence, if a
proximate cause of the injury, death, or damage was the individual's own
negligence.
(2) In an action for damages against a tramway operator or
outdoor recreation operator, the tramway operator or outdoor recreation
operator may plead, as appropriate, the affirmative defense of:
(A) Assumption of the risk by the individual;
(B) Contributory negligence by the individual; or
(C) Both assumption of the risk and contributory
negligence by the individual.

15-11-1008. Inspectors.
(a) The Arkansas Occupational Safety and Health office within the
Department of Labor and Licensing shall make investigators and inspectors
available for as long as the investigators and inspectors need to conduct
02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB203
investigations and inspections of recreational tramways.
(b) The investigators under subsection (a) of this section may obtain
copies of any records or maintenance documents or other requested
documentation as admissible evidence without the issuance of an
administrative inspection warrant or search warrant.
(c) The inspectors under subsection (a) of this section shall have the
duty and authority to investigate, inspect, and determine whether a tramway
operator has:
(1) Violated the laws of the State of Arkansas or of the United
States respecting the operation of a recreational tramway; or
(2) Operated the recreational tramway in such a way as to
endanger the general health and welfare of the public.

15-11-1009. Claims against a state entity.
A claim arising out of this subchapter against a state board, employee,
or other body or person employed by the State of Arkansas under this
subchapter shall be submitted to the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

/s/Hester

















02-12-2025 14:02:52 CRH126